Wisconsin, session 2025, AB611.
do enact as follows:AB611,11Section 1. 115.437 (2) (b) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB611,2,62115.437 (2) (b) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, the per pupil amount 3paid to school districts under par. (a) is the sum of the per pupil amount paid under 4this subsection in the previous year and the change in the per pupil amount paid 5under s. 119.23 (4) (bg) 3. for a pupil enrolled in a grade from 9 to 12 between the 6previous school year and the current school year, if positive.AB611,2,77